Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Penalties

186.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

186.020

,

186.030

,

186.040

, 186.045(4),

186.050

,

186.056

,

186.060

,

186.073

,

186.110

,

186.130

,

186.140

,

186.160

,

186.170

, 186.180(1) to (4)(a), 186.210(1),

186.230

, or KRS

186.655

to

186.680

shall be guilty of a violation.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

138.465

,

186.072

,

186.190

,186.200, or 186.210(2) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

A person who violates the provisions of KRS 186.450(4), (5), or (6) or 186.452(3), (4), or (5) shall be guilty of a violation. A person who violates any of the other provisions of KRS

186.400

to

186.640

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Any clerk or judge failing to comply with KRS 186.550(1) shall be guilty of a violation.

If it appears to the satisfaction of the trial court that any offender under KRS

186.400

to

186.640

has a driver’s license but in good faith failed to have it on his or her person or misplaced or lost it, the court may, in its discretion, dismiss the charges against the defendant without fine, imprisonment, or cost.

Any person who steals a motor vehicle registration plate or renewal decal shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Displaying a canceled registration plate on a motor vehicle shall be prima facie evidence of guilt under this section.

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS

186.1911

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who makes a false affidavit to secure a license plate under KRS

186.172

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

186.070

or

186.150

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who operates a vehicle bearing a dealer’s plate upon the highways of this Commonwealth with intent to evade the motor vehicle usage tax or registration fee shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class D felony for each subsequent offense.

Any person, other than a licensed dealer or manufacturer, who procures a dealer’s plate with intent to evade the motor vehicle usage tax or registration fee shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any resident who unlawfully registers, titles, or licenses a motor vehicle in any state other than Kentucky with intent to evade the motor vehicle usage tax or the registration fee shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if the amount of tax due is less than one hundred dollars ($100), or of a Class D felony if the amount of tax due is more than one hundred dollars ($100), and in addition shall be liable for all taxes so evaded with applicable interest and penalties.

History.

2739g-5c, 2739g-6, 2739g-7, 2739g-65, 2739g-103, 2739g-104, 2739m-36, 2739m-48, 2739m-59, 2739m-69: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 208, § 4; 1958, ch. 70, § 28; 1960, ch. 37, § 5; 1966, ch. 83, § 2; 1970, ch. 92, § 58; 1978, ch. 101, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 296, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 303, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 373, § 7(1) to (9), effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 118, § 104, effective July 1, 1987; 1986, ch. 431, § 14, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 498, § 6, effective April 1, 1987; 1992, ch. 463, § 20, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 198, § 17, effective October 1, 1996; 2000, ch. 441, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 103, § 5, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 65, § 8, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 15, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2008, ch. 176, § 3, effective July 15, 2008.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

7/15/2008). This section was amended by 2008 Ky. Acts chs. 15 and 176, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(6/24/2003). 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 408, sec. 178, renumbered the former subsection (2) of KRS

186.045

as subsection (1), but that Act failed to include a conforming amendment to change the reference to that subsection in subsection (1) of this statute. Under KRS 7.136(1)(e), that change has now been made.

186.991.
Penalties.

Any person who violates, or causes, aids, or abets any violation of KRS

186.053

or of any order, rule, or regulation lawfully issued pursuant thereto, shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 139, § 32; 1978, ch. 101, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 3, effective July 1, 1979; 2015 ch. 19, § 41, effective June 24, 2015.

186.992.
Penalty. [Repealed.]